apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.ca.dix
<pardef n="ate/u__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="CV__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ve/í__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïnes</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïna</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïns</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="addict/e__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>     
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="americ/à__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anes</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ana</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ami/c__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gues</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cs</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="asiàti/c__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cs</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="advoca/t__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="alcalde__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="gos__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sos</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="h/ome__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omes</l>
          <r>ome<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>òmens</l>
          <r>ome<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="t/erme__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ermes</l>
          <r>erme<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>érmens</l>
          <r>erme<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erme</l>
          <r>erme<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="desinter/ès__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essos</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ès</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="acompanyant__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="amfitri/ó__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="indiv/idu__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ídues</l>
          <r>idu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ídua</l>
          <r>idu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idus</l>
          <r>idu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idu</l>
          <r>idu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="alcalde"><i>alcalde</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="alumne"><i>alumn</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="amic"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="català"><i>catal</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="europeu"><i>europe</i><par n="ate/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="germà"><i>germ</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="gos"><i>gos</i><par n="gos__n"/></e>
<e lm="home"><i>h</i><par n="h/ome__n"/></e>
<e lm="home de negocis"><i>h</i><par n="h/ome__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>negocis</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>negocis</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="individu"><i>indiv</i><par n="indiv/idu__n"/></e>
<e lm="interès"><i>inter</i><par n="desinter/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="mestre"><i>mestr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="metge"><i>metge</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="ministre"><i>ministr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="terme"><i>t</i><par n="t/erme__n"/></e>
<e lm="veí"><i>ve</i><par n="ve/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="aliat"><i>alia</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="ajudant"><i>ajudant</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="negre"><i>negr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="farmacèutic"><i>farmacèuti</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="assalariat"><i>assalaria</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="enemic"><i>enemi</i><par n="ami/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="focus"><i>focus</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="amfitrió"><i>amfitri</i><par n="amfitri/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="hoste"><i>hoste</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="nebot"><i>nebo</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="soldat"><i>soldat</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="desconegut"><i>desconegu</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="estrès"><i>estr</i><par n="desinter/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="bessó"><i>bess</i><par n="amfitri/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="artesà"><i>artes</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="nimbus"><i>nimbus</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="afeccionat"><i>afecciona</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="auxiliar"><i>auxiliar</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="tigre"><i>tigre</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="gòtic"><i>gòti</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="filisteu"><i>filiste</i><par n="ate/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="campió"><i>campi</i><par n="amfitri/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="sorites"><i>sorites</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="lleó"><i>lle</i><par n="amfitri/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="botànic"><i>botàni</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="coronel"><i>coronel</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="tapajunts"><i>tapajunts</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="esguerrat"><i>esguerra</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="gauss"><i>gauss</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="còmic"><i>còmi</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="xarlatà"><i>xarlat</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="crocodilià"><i>crocodili</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="vident"><i>vident</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="rentaplats"><i>rentaplats</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="comte"><i>comte</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="eclèctic"><i>eclècti</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="escribà"><i>escrib</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="xerès"><i>xer</i><par n="desinter/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="metal·lúrgic"><i>metal·lúrgi</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="caos"><i>caos</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="vidu"><i>v</i><par n="indiv/idu__n"/></e>
<e lm="culpable"><i>culpable</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="nouvingut"><i>nouvingu</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="addicte"><i>addict</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="diplomàtic"><i>diplomàti</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="veterà"><i>veter</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="menys"><i>menys</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="pediatre"><i>pediatr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="rebel"><i>rebel</i><par n="acompanyant__n"/></e>
<e lm="sastre"><i>sastre</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
<e lm="presbiterià"><i>presbiteri</i><par n="americ/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="encarregat"><i>encarrega</i><par n="advoca/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="frontis"><i>frontis</i><par n="CV__n"/></e>
<e lm="geriatre"><i>geriatr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="plebeu"><i>plebe</i><par n="ate/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="monàrquic"><i>monàrqui</i><par n="asiàti/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="arquitecte"><i>arquitect</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
